Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXX Contracts
Installment Sales Contracts

371.210.
Definitions for KRS 371.210 to 371.330.

As used in KRS

371.210

to

371.330

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Goods” means all tangible chattels personal when purchased primarily for personal, family or household use and not for commercial, industrial or agricultural use, but not including motor vehicles as herein defined, money, things in action or intangible personal property other than merchandise certificates or coupons as herein described. The term includes such chattels which are furnished or used, at the sale of or subsequently, in the modernization, rehabilitation, repair, alteration, improvement or construction of real property as to become a part thereof whether or not severable therefrom. The term also includes merchandise certificates or coupons, issued by a retail seller, not redeemable in cash and to be used in their face amount in lieu of cash.

“Services” means work, labor or services of any kind when purchased primarily for personal, family or household use and not for commercial or business use, but not including services for which the prices charged are required by law to be determined or approved by or to be filed, subject to approval or disapproval, with the United States or any state, or any department, division, agency, officer or official of either as in the case of transportation services.

“Motor vehicle” means any automobile, mobile home, recreational vehicle, motorcycle, truck trailer, semitrailer, truck tractor and bus designed and used primarily to transport persons or property on a public highway, or any vehicle designed to run only on rails or tracks or in the air, excepting however, any boat trailer and any vehicle propelled or drawn exclusively by muscular power.

“Retail buyer” or “buyer” means a person who buys or agrees to buy goods or obtain services or agrees to have services rendered or furnished, from a retail seller.

“Retail seller” or “seller” means a person regularly and principally engaged in the business of selling goods to retail buyers.

“Retail installment transaction” means any transaction in which a retail buyer purchases goods or services from a retail seller pursuant to a retail installment contract or a retail charge agreement, as defined in this section, which provides for a time price differential, as defined in this section, and under which the buyer agrees to pay the unpaid balance in one (1) or more installments.

“Retail installment contract” means an instrument, other than a retail charge agreement or an instrument reflecting a sale made pursuant thereto, entered into in this state evidencing a retail installment transaction. The term “retail installment contract” may include a chattel mortgage, a security agreement, a conditional sale contract and a contract in the form of a bailment or a lease if the bailee or lessee contracts to pay as compensation for their use a sum substantially equivalent to or in excess of the value of the goods sold and if it is agreed that the bailee or lessee is bound to become, or for no other or a merely nominal consideration, has the option of becoming the owner of the goods upon full compliance with the provisions of the bailment or lease.

“Retail charge agreement” means an instrument prescribing the terms of retail installment transactions which may be made thereunder from time to time and under the terms of which a time price differential, as defined in this section, is to be computed in relation to the buyer’s unpaid balance from time to time.

“Time price differential” however denominated or expressed, means the amount which is paid or payable for the privilege of purchasing goods or services to be paid for by the buyer in installments over a period of time. It does not include the amount, if any, charged for insurance premiums, delinquency charges, attorneys fees, court costs, or official fees.

“Cash sale price” means the price stated in a retail installment contract or in a sales slip or other memorandum furnished by a retail seller to a retail buyer under or in connection with a retail charge agreement, for which the seller would have sold or furnished to the buyer and the buyer would have bought or obtained from the seller the goods or services which are the subject matter of a retail installment transaction, if the sale had been a sale for cash. The cash sale price may include any taxes and charges for delivery, installation, servicing, repairs, alterations or improvements.

“Official fees” means the amount of the fees prescribed by law for filing, recording or otherwise perfecting, and releasing or satisfying, a retained title, lien or other security interest created by a retail installment transaction.

“Time sale price” means the total of the cash sale price of the goods or services and the amount, if any, included for insurance, if a separate identified charge is made therefor, and the official fees and the time price differential.

“Principal balance” means the cash sale price of the goods or services which are the subject matter of a retail installment contract plus the amounts, if any, included therein, if a separate identified charge is made therefor and stated in the contract, for insurance and official fees, less the amount of the buyer’s down payment in money or goods or both.

“Holder” means the retail seller of the goods or services under the retail installment contract or retail charge agreement or the assignee if the retail installment contract or the retail charge agreement or any indebtedness under either has been sold or otherwise transferred.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, joint venture, corporation, association or any other group, however organized.

Words of the masculine gender include the feminine and the neuter and, when the sense so indicates, words of the neuter gender may refer to any gender.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 1; 1982, ch. 395, § 23, effective July 15, 1982.

371.220.
Requisites of retail installment contract.

Each retail installment contract shall be in writing, dated, signed by the retail buyer, and completed as to all essential provisions, except as otherwise provided in KRS

371.250

.

The printed or typed portion of the contract, other than instructions for completion, shall be in a size equal to at least eight (8) point type. The contract shall be designated “Retail Installment Contract” and shall contain substantially the following notice printed or typed in a size equal to at least ten (10) point bold type: “NOTICE TO THE BUYER. DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT BEFORE YOU READ IT OR IF IT CONTAINS BLANK SPACES. YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A COPY OF THE CONTRACT YOU SIGN.”

The retail seller shall deliver to the retail buyer, or mail to him at his address shown on the retail installment contract, a copy of the contract as accepted by the seller. Until the seller does so, a buyer, who has not received delivery of the goods or been furnished or rendered the services, shall have the right to rescind his contract and to receive a refund of all payments made and return of all goods traded in to the seller on account of or in contemplation of the contract, or if such goods cannot be returned, the value thereof. Any acknowledgment by the buyer of delivery of a copy of the contract shall be in a size equal to at least ten (10) point bold type and, if contained in the contract, shall appear directly above the buyer’s signature.

The retail installment contract shall contain the names of the seller and the buyer, the place of business of the seller, the residence or other address of the buyer as specified by the buyer and a description or identification of the goods sold or to be sold, or services furnished or rendered or to be furnished or rendered.

The retail installment contract shall contain the following items:

The cash sale price of the goods or services;

The amount of the buyer’s down payment, identifying the amounts paid in money and allowed for goods traded in;

The difference between items (a) and (b);

The aggregate amount, if any, included for insurance, if a separate identified charge is made therefor, specifying the type or types of insurance and the term or terms of coverage;

The aggregate amount of official fees;

The principal balance, which is the sum of items (c), (d) and (e);

The amount of the time price differential; and

The amount of the time balance owed by the buyer to the seller, which is the sum of items (f) and (g) and, except as otherwise provided in the next two (2) sentences, the maximum number of installment payments required and the amount of each installment and the due date of each payment necessary to pay such balance. If installment payments other than the final payment are stated as a series of equal scheduled amounts and if the amount of the final installment payment does not substantially exceed the scheduled amount of each preceding installment payment, the maximum number of payments and the amount and due date of each payment need not be separately stated and the amount of the scheduled final installment payment may be stated as the remaining unpaid balance. The due date of the first installment payment may be fixed by a day or date or may be fixed by reference to the date of the contract or to the time of delivery or installation.

The above items need not be stated in the sequence or order set forth; additional items may be included to explain the computations made in determining the amount to be paid by the buyer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsections (1) to (5).

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Certain items not required when contracts made by mail, KRS

371.240

.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Answer Asserting Various Defenses Based upon Writing or Signature Formalities or Lack of Definiteness, Form 210.16.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint for Breach of Written Contract (General Form), Form 210.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Contracts, § 210.00.

371.230.
Contracts composed of more than one document.

A retail installment contract need not be contained in a single document. If the contract is contained in more than one (1) document, one (1) such document shall be an original document signed by the retail buyer, stated to be applicable to purchases of goods or services to be made by the retail buyer from time to time. In such case such document, together with the sales slip, account book or other written statement relating to each purchase, shall set forth all of the information required by KRS

371.220

to

371.290

and shall constitute the retail installment contract for each purchase. On each succeeding purchase pursuant to such original document, the sales slip, account book or other written statement may at the option of the seller constitute the memorandum required by KRS

371.290

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (6).

371.240.
Contracts made by mail.

Retail installment contracts negotiated and entered into by mail without personal solicitation by salesmen or other representatives of the seller and based upon a catalog of the seller, or other printed solicitation of business, if such catalog or other printed solicitation clearly sets forth the cash sale prices and other terms of sales to be made through such medium, may be made as provided in this section. The provisions of KRS

371.210

to

371.330

with respect to retail installment contracts shall be applicable to such sales, except that:

The designation and notice provisions of subsection (2) of KRS

371.220

shall not be applicable to such contract; and

The retail installment contract, when completed by the buyer, need not contain the items required by subsection (5) of KRS

371.220

.

When the contract is received from the retail buyer, the seller shall prepare a written memorandum containing all of the information required by subsection (5) of KRS

371.220

to be included in a retail installment contract. In lieu of delivering a copy of the contract to the retail buyer as provided in subsection (3) of KRS

371.220

, the seller shall deliver to the buyer a copy of such memorandum prior to the due date of the first installment payable under the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (7).

371.250.
Contract not to be signed in blank — Acknowledgment of delivery of copy.

A retail installment contract shall not be signed by any party thereto when it contains blank spaces of items which are essential provisions of the transaction; provided, however, if delivery of the goods is not made at the time of the execution of the contract, the identifying numbers or marks of the goods or similar information and the due date of the first installment may be inserted by the seller in the seller’s counterpart of the contract after it has been signed by the buyer. The buyer’s acknowledgment, conforming to the requirements of KRS

371.220

to

371.290

, of delivery of a copy of the contract shall be presumptive proof or, in the case of a holder of the contract without knowledge to the contrary when he purchases it, conclusive proof of such delivery and of compliance with this section in any action or proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (8).

371.260.
Time price differential — Prepayment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, a retail installment contract payable in substantially equal successive monthly installments beginning one (1) month from the date of the contract may provide for, and the seller or holder may then charge, collect, and receive a time price differential.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any retail installment contract to the contrary, any buyer may prepay in full the unpaid time balance thereof at any time before its final due date and, if he does so, shall receive a refund credit thereon for such prepayment. The amount of such refund credit shall represent at least as great a proportion of the original time price differential, after deducting therefrom a maximum of twenty dollars ($20), as (a) the sum of the monthly unpaid balances under the schedule of payments in the contract beginning as of the date after such prepayment which is the next succeeding monthly anniversary date of the due date of the first installment under the contract, or, if the prepayment is prior to the due date of the first installment under the contract, then as of the date after such prepayment which is the next succeeding monthly anniversary date of the date of the contract, bears to (b) the sum of all the monthly unpaid balances under the schedule of installment payments in the contract. Where the amount of refund credit is less than one dollar ($1), no refund credit need be made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsections (9) and (10); 1996, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

371.270.
Charge for installment defaults — Refinancing options.

The holder of any retail installment contract, if it so provides, may collect a delinquency and collection charge on each installment in default for a period of more than ten (10) days in the amount not to exceed five (5%) percent of each installment or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater, provided that a minimum charge of one dollar ($1) may be made, or, in lieu thereof, interest after maturity on each such installment not to exceed the highest lawful contract rate.

The holder of a retail installment contract upon request by the buyer, may agree to an amendment thereto to extend or defer the scheduled due date of all or any part of any installment or installments or to renew, restate or reschedule the unpaid balance of the contract, and may collect for same a refinance charge not to exceed an amount ascertained as provided under either of the following optional methods of computation:

The amendment to the contract must be confirmed in a writing signed by the holder. The writing shall set forth the terms of the amendment and the new due dates and amounts of the installments, and shall either be delivered to the buyer or mailed to him at his address as shown on the contract. Said writing together with the original contract and any previous amendments thereto shall constitute the retail installment contract.

Option I. The refinance charge may be computed on the amount of the scheduled installment or installments extended or deferred for the period of extension or deferment at the rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month; provided that a minimum deferment charge of one dollar ($1) shall be permitted. Such amendment may also include payment by the buyer of the additional cost to the holder of premiums for continuing in force any insurance coverages provided for in the contract until the end of such deferral period, and of any additional necessary official fees. Option II. The refinance charge may be computed as follows: The sum of the unpaid balance as of the refinancing date and the cost for any insurance and other benefits incidental to the refinancing, and for any additional necessary official fees and any accrued delinquency and collection charges, after deducting a refund credit as for prepayment pursuant to subsection (2) of , shall constitute a principal balance for such refinancing on which the refinance charge may be computed for the term of the refinanced contract at the applicable rate for finance charges. Acquisition costs under the refund schedule in subsection (2) of shall not apply in calculating refinance charges. KRS

371.260

KRS

371.260

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (11); 1996, ch. 59, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

For indirect loans or purchases of installment paper under KRS

190.120

, 371.260(2) and subsection (2) of this section, KRS

287.215

expressly permits deduction of the $10.00 or $25.00 acquisition cost before computing the rebate due upon prepayment. The proportion or ratio is established “after” the acquisition cost is deducted.

OAG 82-260

.

371.280.
Written statement of payments and amount unpaid.

Upon written request of the buyer, the holder of a retail installment contract shall give or forward to the buyer a written statement of the dates and amounts of payments and the total amount unpaid under the contract. A buyer shall be given a written receipt for any payment when made in cash. Such a statement or receipt shall be given the buyer once without charge; if any additional statement is requested by the buyer, it shall be supplied by the holder at a charge not in excess of one dollar ($1) for each additional statement or receipt so supplied.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (12).

371.290.
Consolidation of subsequent purchases with existing contract — Memorandum — Allocation of payments.

If, in a retail installment transaction, a retail buyer makes any subsequent purchases of goods or services from a retail seller from whom he has previously purchased goods or services under one or more retail installment contracts, and the amounts under such previous contract or contracts have not been fully paid, the subsequent purchases may, at the seller’s option, be included in and consolidated with one or more of the previous contract or contracts. Each subsequent purchase shall be a separate retail installment contract under KRS

371.210

to

371.330

, notwithstanding that the same may be included in and consolidated with one or more of such previous contract or contracts. All the provisions of KRS

371.210

to

371.330

with respect to retail installment contracts shall be applicable to such subsequent purchases except as stated in subsections (2) to (7) of this section.

In the event of such consolidation, in lieu of the buyer’s executing a retail installment contract respecting each subsequent purchase, as provided in KRS

371.220

to

371.290

, it shall be sufficient if the seller shall prepare a written memorandum of each subsequent purchase, in which case the provisions of subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of KRS

371.220

shall not be applicable. Unless previously furnished in writing to the buyer by the seller, by sales slip, memoranda, or otherwise, such memorandum shall set forth with respect to each subsequent purchase the following:

The cash sale price of the goods or services;

The amount of the buyer’s down payment, identifying the amounts paid in money and allowed for goods traded in;

The difference between items (a) and (b);

The aggregate amount, if any, included for insurance, if a separate identified charge is made therefor, specifying the type or types of insurance and the term or terms of coverage;

The aggregate amount of official fees;

The principal balance, which is the sum of items (c), (d), and (e);

The amount or rate of the time price differential;

The amount of the time balance owed by the buyer to the seller, which is the sum of items (f) and (g);

The outstanding balance of the previous contract or contracts;

The consolidated time balance, which is the sum of items (h) and (i);

The revised installments applicable to the consolidated time balance, if any.

The seller shall deliver to the buyer a copy of such memorandum prior to the due date of the first installment of such consolidated contract.

When such subsequent purchases are made, if the seller has retained title or taken a lien or other security interest in any of the goods purchased under any one of the contracts included in the consolidation.

The entire amount of all payments made prior to such subsequent purchases shall be deemed to have been applied on the previous purchases.

Each payment after such subsequent purchases made on this consolidated contract shall be deemed to have been allocated to all of the various purchases in the same ratio as the original cash sale prices of the various purchases bear to the total of all.

Where the amount of each installment payment is increased in connection with such subsequent purchases, at the seller’s option, the subsequent payments may be deemed to be allocated as follows: an amount equal to the original periodic payment to the previous purchase, the balance to the subsequent purchase. However, the amount of any down payment on the subsequent purchase shall be allocated in its entirety to such subsequent purchase.

The provisions of subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section shall not apply to cases where such previous and subsequent purchases involve equipment, parts, or other goods attached or affixed to goods previously purchased and not fully paid, or to services in connection therewith rendered by the seller at the buyer’s request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 2, subsection (13).

371.300.
Requisites of retail charge agreement.

Each retail charge agreement shall be in writing and signed or accepted by the buyer. A retail charge agreement shall be deemed to be signed or accepted by the buyer if, after a request for a retail charge account, the agreement or application for a retail charge account is in fact signed by the buyer, or if the retail charge account is used by the buyer, or if the retail charge account is used by another person authorized by the buyer to use it. The agreement shall not become effective until the buyer has received the disclosures required pursuant to the Federal Truth-in-Lending Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 1601

et seq., and the buyer or person authorized by the buyer uses the retail charge account. A copy of any such agreement executed or accepted by the buyer on or after January 1, 1963, shall be delivered or mailed to the buyer by the seller prior to the date on which the first payment is due thereunder. Any acknowledgment by the buyer of delivery of a copy of the agreement contained in the body thereof shall be in a size equal to at least ten (10) point bold type and shall appear directly above the buyer’s signature. No agreement executed on or after January 1, 1963, shall be signed or accepted by the buyer when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed. The buyer’s acknowledgment, conforming to the requirements of this subsection, of delivery of a copy of an agreement, shall be presumptive proof, in any action or proceeding, of such delivery and that the agreement, when signed or accepted, did not contain any blank spaces as provided in KRS

371.210

to

371.330

. All retail charge agreements executed on or after January 1, 1963, shall state the maximum amount or rate of the time price differential to be charged and paid pursuant thereto. Any such agreement shall contain substantially the following notice printed or typed in a size equal to at least ten (10) point bold type: “NOTICE TO THE BUYER — DO NOT SIGN THIS AGREEMENT BEFORE YOU READ IT OR IF IT CONTAINS BLANK SPACES. YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A COPY OF THE AGREEMENT YOU SIGN.”

The seller shall promptly supply the buyer under the retail charge agreement with a statement as of the end of each monthly period, which need not be a calendar month, or other regular period agreed upon in writing by the seller and the buyer, in which there is any unpaid balance thereunder, which statement shall recite the following:

The unpaid balance under the retail charge agreement at the beginning and at the end of the period;

Unless otherwise furnished by the seller to the buyer by sales slip, memorandum, or otherwise, a description or identification of the goods or services purchased during the period, the cash sale price and the date of each purchase;

The payments made by the buyer to the seller and any other credits to the buyer during the period;

The amount, if any, of any time price differential for such period; and

A legend to the effect that the buyer may at any time pay his total unpaid balance or any part thereof.

A retail charge agreement may provide for, and the seller or holder may then, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, charge, collect and receive, in addition to the cash price, a time price differential for the privilege of paying in installments thereunder.

The holder of a retail charge agreement, if it so provides, may collect a delinquency and collection charge on each minimum payment in default for a period of more than ten (10) days in an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of each minimum payment, or ten dollars ($10), whichever is greater.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 3; 1996, ch. 59, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

371.310.
Assignment of contracts and agreements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law:

An assignee may purchase or acquire or agree to purchase or acquire any retail installment contract or retail charge agreement or any indebtedness under either from a seller on such terms and conditions and for such price as may be mutually agreed upon;

Filing of the assignment, notice to the buyer of the assignment and any requirement that the seller be deprived of dominion over payments upon a retail installment contract or retail charge agreement, or over the goods if returned to or repossessed by the seller, shall not be necessary to the validity of a written assignment of the retail installment contract or retail charge agreement or any indebtedness under either as against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledgees, mortgagees and lien claimants of the seller; and

Unless the buyer has notice of the assignment of his retail installment contract, retail charge agreement or any indebtedness under either, payment therefor made by the buyer to the holder last known to him shall be binding upon all subsequent holders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 4.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since, under this section, banks may purchase retail installment sales contracts or retail charge agreements made between a retailer and a purchaser pursuant to KRS

371.210

et seq. from the retailer seller, banks may take over contracts made between the retailer and the purchaser, and may collect a time price differential as set out in such contracts even though the time price differential exceeds the six-add rate which would be permitted to the bank had it directly loaned the money to the purchaser pursuant to KRS

287.215

.

OAG 80-51

.

371.320.
Prior acts and agreements of retail buyer do not waive requirements of KRS 371.210 to 371.330.

No act or agreement of the retail buyer before or at the time of the making of a retail installment contract, retail charge agreement or purchases thereunder shall constitute a valid waiver of any of the provisions of KRS

371.210

to

371.330

or of any remedies granted to the buyer by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Weinberg, Commercial Law and Consumer Credit, 65 Ky. L.J. 370 (1976-77).

371.325.
Operation of waiver of defense clause as to defense acquired in third party materialmen’s lien.

No waiver of defense clause in any retail installment contract shall operate to cut off any defense that an owner-occupant of a single or double family dwelling or the appurtenances or additions thereto may have acquired by virtue of a third party materialmen’s lien under KRS 376.010(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 173, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Weinberg, Commercial Law and Consumer Credit, 65 Ky. L.J. 370 (1976-77).

371.330.
KRS 371.210 to 371.330 do not affect validity of pre-1963 contracts.

The provisions of KRS

371.210

to

371.330

shall not invalidate or make unlawful retail installment contracts or retail charge agreements executed prior to January 1, 1963.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 136, § 7.